Washington statutes.
RCW 1.20.050

Standard time—Daylight saving time. (Contingent repeal.)

No county, city or other political subdivision of this state shall adopt any provision for the observance of daylight saving time, or any time other than standard, except pursuant to a gubernatorial proclamation declaring an emergency during a period of national war and authorizing such adoption, or unless other than standard time is established on a national basis: PROVIDED, That this section shall not apply to orders made by federal authorities in a local area entirely under federal control.

[ 1953 c 2 s 1 (Initiative Measure No. 181, approved November 4, 1952).]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: 2019 c 297 contains a contingent repeal section and a contingent effective date section. This section and RCW 1.20.051 and 1.20.052 will be repealed under 2019 c 297 s 4 on the date provided in 2019 c 297 s 5 when the contingency in 2019 c 297 s 5 occurs.

Contingent repeal—2019 c 297: See note following RCW 1.20.052.